Colorado, session 2026A, SB105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-10-601.5, amend
(1)(d) as follows:
30-10-601.5. Qualifications - fingerprints.
(1) A person is eligible to hold the office of coroner if the person:
(d) For a coroner elected on or after November 5, 2024, in a county
with a population greater than one hundred fifty THREE HUNDRED thousand,
is a death investigator certified by and in good standing with the American
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

board of medicolegal death investigators or is a forensic pathologist
certified by and in good standing with the American board of pathology.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 30-10-625 as
follows:
30-10-625. County coroner - financial interest in regulated
businesses - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "FINANCIAL INTEREST" MEANS AN OWNERSHIP INTEREST,
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONSHIP, MANAGEMENT ROLE, CONTRACTUAL
RELATIONSHIP, OR OTHER DIRECT PECUNIARY INTEREST.
(2) (a) THE CORONER DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION WHO HAS A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN A BUSINESS THAT IS SUBJECT TO REGULATION OR
OVERSIGHT BY THE OFFICE OF THE CORONER SHALL DISCLOSE THAT INTEREST
IN WRITING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) A COUNTY CORONER SHALL DISCLOSE ANY FINANCIAL INTEREST
IN A MORTUARY, FUNERAL HOME, CREMATORY, EMBALMING SERVICE, OR
OTHER DEATH-CARE BUSINESS THAT MAY BE SUBJECT TO REFERRAL,
INVESTIGATION, OVERSIGHT, OR OTHER OFFICIAL ACTION BY THE CORONER'S
OFFICE.
(3) THE CORONER SHALL DISCLOSE A FINANCIAL INTEREST IN A
REGULATED BUSINESS AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION BY
POSTING A NOTICE OF THE FINANCIAL INTEREST ON THE CORONER'S WEBSITE.
(4) A CORONER WHO HAS DISCLOSED A FINANCIAL INTEREST
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL NOT PARTICIPATE IN ANY OFFICIAL
ACTION THAT WOULD DIRECTLY AND SPECIFICALLY AFFECT THE BUSINESS IN
WHICH THE CORONER HAS THE FINANCIAL INTEREST.
(5) THIS SECTION APPLIES IN ADDITION TO, AND DOES NOT LIMIT, ANY
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST, ETHICS, OR DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS FOR A
CORONER IMPOSED BY OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(6) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A
CANDIDATE FOR, OR SERVING AS, A COUNTY CORONER FROM OPERATING A
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-105

MORTUARY, FUNERAL HOME, CREMATORY, EMBALMING SERVICE, OR OTHER
DEATH-CARE BUSINESS.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-105

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-105